Maryland, session 2026, HB0307.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
1–3A–01.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Executive Director” means the Executive Director of the Office of Social
Equity.
(c) “Fund” means the Community Reinvestment and Repair Fund.
(d) “Office” means the Office of Social Equity ESTABLISHED UNDER § 9–4108
OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
1–3A–02.
(b) The General Assembly therefore finds that the public interest is served by:
(1) acknowledging and repairing the causes and consequences of
disparities in arrests and imprisonment in prosecutions of cannabis–related offenses
among specific populations and geographic regions;
(2) developing, among existing members of communities that have been
disproportionately and negatively impacted, the capacity to ascertain and address the
social and economic determinants that are fundamental to reducing the impact of
longstanding inequities and improving economic, educational, and health outcomes; and
(3) being consistent with social equity principles and governance by
allocating a significant portion of tax revenue from the adult–use cannabis market to the
Community Reinvestment and Repair Fund for distribution to local jurisdictions to be
administered by the local jurisdictions.
1–3A–03.
(a) (1) There is a Community Reinvestment and Repair Fund.
(2) The purpose of the Fund is:

HOUSE BILL 307 3
(I) to provide funds to community–based organizations that serve
communities determined by the Office, in consultation with the Office of the Attorney
General, to have been the most impacted by disproportionate enforcement of the cannabis
prohibition before July 1, 2022; AND
(II) TO SERVE THE PUBLIC INTEREST STATED UNDER §
1–3A–02(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(3) The Comptroller shall administer the Fund AT THE DIRECTION OF
THE OFFICE.
(4) (i) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to §
7–302 of the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(ii) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(5) The Fund consists of:
(i) sales and use tax revenue distributed to the Fund under §
2–1302.2 of the Tax – General Article;
(ii) conversion fees paid by businesses under § 36–403 of this article;
and
(iii) any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit
of the Fund, in accordance with any conditions adopted by the Comptroller for the
acceptance of donations or gifts to the Fund.
(6) (i) The Fund [may] SHALL be used only [for:
1. funding community–based initiatives intended to benefit
low–income communities, including:
A. behavioral health crisis response services;
B. education and after–school programs;
C. truancy and absenteeism intervention programs;
D. housing and homelessness prevention initiatives;
E. transportation improvements in high–density areas that
have public transportation;
F. job training and workforce development programs;

HOUSE BILL 307
G. community child care and recreational services; and
H. programs that benefit individuals and families impacted
by incarceration;
2. funding community–based initiatives that serve
disproportionately impacted areas, as defined in § 36–101 of this article; and
3. any related administrative expenses incurred by a local
government in administering the funds that do not exceed 15% of the funds received in the
fiscal year.
(ii) Money may not be expended from the Fund for law enforcement
agencies or activities.
(iii) Money expended from the Fund is supplemental to and may not
supplant funding that otherwise would be appropriated for preexisting local government
programs] AS PROVIDED UNDER § 1–3A–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(7) (i) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the
same manner as other State money may be invested.
(ii) Any interest earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the
General Fund of the State.
(8) No part of the Fund may revert or be credited to:
(i) the General Fund of the State; or
(ii) any other special fund of the State.
(9) The Comptroller shall pay out money from the Fund.
(10) The Fund is subject to audit by the Office of Legislative Audits as
provided for in § 2–1220 of the State Government Article.
(b) (1) Based on the percentage allocable to each county determined by the
Office, the Comptroller shall distribute funds from the Fund to each county in an amount
that, for the period from July 1, 2002, to January 1, 2023, both inclusive, is proportionate
to the total number of cannabis possession charges in the county compared to the total
number of cannabis possession charges in the State.
(2) For any distribution of funds to a county under paragraph (1) of this
subsection, the county shall hold the funds separately from other revenue and general
funds.

HOUSE BILL 307 5
(3) Subject to the limitations under [subsection (a)(6) of this section] §
1–3A–04 OF THIS SUBTITLE, each county shall adopt a law establishing the purpose for
which money received from the Fund may be used.
(c) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “STAKEHOLDER” MEANS:
(I) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO RESIDES IN OR REPRESENTS A
COMMUNITY IDENTIFIED BY THE OFFICE AS HAVING BEEN DISPROPORTIONATELY
IMPACTED BY CANNABIS ENFORCEMENT;
(II) A COMMUNITY–BASED ORGANIZATION THAT SERVES OR IS
LED BY RESIDENTS OF A COMMUNITY IDENTIFIED BY THE OFFICE AS HAVING BEEN
DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED BY CANNABIS ENFORCEMENT; OR
(III) ANY OTHER INDIVIDUAL OR COMMUNITY–BASED
ORGANIZATION THAT HAS A DEMONSTRATED EXPERIENCE OR EXPERTISE IN
ADDRESSING THE SOCIAL, ECONOMIC, OR HEALTH HARMS CAUSED BY CANNABIS
CRIMINALIZATION.
(2) The Office shall require each county to develop a plan for the
distribution of funds [to community–based organizations for use] in accordance with this
section.
[(2)] (3) The plan developed by a county shall be:
(i) established before distributing funds under this section;
(ii) developed in consultation with stakeholders; [and]
(iii) the subject of a public hearing before finalizing the plan; AND
(IV) MADE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE.
(4) A COUNTY PLAN UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL:
(I) IDENTIFY THE GEOGRAPHIC AREAS AND POPULATIONS
WITHIN THE COUNTY DETERMINED TO HAVE BEEN MOST IMPACTED BY THE
DISPROPORTIONATE ENFORCEMENT OF CANNABIS LAWS; AND
(II) DESCRIBE HOW THE PROPOSED USES OF FUNDS ARE
CONSISTENT WITH THE FUND USES ESTABLISHED UNDER § 1–3A–04 OF THIS
SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 307
(5) EACH COUNTY SHALL CONSULT WITH THE OFFICE TO MAKE ANY
ADJUSTMENTS TO A PLAN DEVELOPED UNDER THIS SECTION.
[(3)] (6) On or before October 1, 2025, the Office shall adopt regulations
to carry out this section.
(d) On or before October 1, 2026, and each October 1 thereafter, each county shall
submit a report to the Office [on] THAT INCLUDES:
(1) the amount of funds received from the Fund under subsection (b)(1) of
this section;
(2) the [organizations] ENTITIES that received funding from the county
under this section;
(3) the methods used by the county to solicit, review, and select
[organizations] ENTITIES that may be eligible for funding under this section; [and]
(4) THE administrative expenses related to the county’s administration
and distribution of the funds received under subsection (b)(1) of this section; AND
(5) DATA ON THE POPULATIONS SERVED AND SERVICES PROVIDED.
(E) THE COMPTROLLER, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE OFFICE, SHALL
ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE.
1–3A–04.
(A) MONEY DISTRIBUTED FROM THE FUND UNDER § 1–3A–03(B) OF THIS
SUBTITLE SHALL BE USED BY A COUNTY TO FUND:
(1) COMMUNITY–BASED INITIATIVES INTENDED TO BENEFIT
LOW–INCOME COMMUNITIES IN GEOGRAPHIC AREAS MOST IMPACTED BY THE
DISPROPORTIONATE ENFORCEMENT OF CANNABIS LAWS; AND
(2) PROGRAMS OR PROJECTS THAT ADVANCE THE STATED PURPOSES
OF THE FUND UNDER § 1–3A–03(A)(2) OF THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING:
(I) BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CRISIS RESPONSE SERVICES;
(II) EDUCATION AND AFTER–SCHOOL PROGRAMS;
(III) TRUANCY AND ABSENTEEISM INTERVENTION PROGRAMS;

HOUSE BILL 307 7
(IV) HOUSING AND HOMELESSNESS PREVENTION INITIATIVES;
(V) TRANSPORTATION IMPROVEMENTS IN HIGH–DENSITY
AREAS THAT HAVE PUBLIC TRANSPORTATION;
(VI) JOB TRAINING AND WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
PROGRAMS;
(VII) COMMUNITY CHILD CARE AND RECREATIONAL SERVICES;
AND
(VIII) PROGRAMS THAT BENEFIT INDIVIDUALS AND FAMILIES
IMPACTED BY INCARCERATION;
(3) COMMUNITY–BASED INITIATIVES THAT SERVE
DISPROPORTIONATELY IMPACTED AREAS, AS DEFINED IN § 36–101 OF THIS
ARTICLE; AND
(4) ANY RELATED ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES INCURRED BY A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT IN ADMINISTERING THE FUNDS THAT DO NOT EXCEED 15% OF THE
FUNDS RECEIVED IN THE FISCAL YEAR.
(B) MONEY MAY NOT BE EXPENDED FROM THE FUND FOR LAW
ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES OR ACTIVITIES.
(C) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND SHALL BE SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND
MAY NOT SUPPLANT FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE APPROPRIATED FOR
PREEXISTING LOCAL GOVERNMENT PROGRAMS.
Article – State Government
9–4108.
(a) There is an Office of Social Equity within the Department.
(b) (1) The Governor shall appoint an Executive Director of the Office of Social
Equity.
(2) The Executive Director of the Office of Social Equity shall have at least
5 years of experience in civil rights advocacy, civil rights litigation, or another area of social
justice.
(c) The Office of Social Equity may employ staff and retain contractors as may be
required to carry out the functions of the Office.

HOUSE BILL 307
(d) The Office of Social Equity shall:
(1) promote and encourage full participation in the regulated cannabis
industry by people from communities that have previously been disproportionately
impacted by the war on drugs in order to positively impact those communities;
(2) [With the assistance of the Comptroller, oversee] DIRECT THE
ADMINISTRATION OF the Community Reinvestment and Repair Fund under § 1–3A–03 of
the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article;
(3) consult with and assist the Department of Commerce in the
administration of the Cannabis Business Assistance Fund under § 5–1901 of the Economic
Development Article;
(4) identify and oppose regulations that unnecessarily burden or
undermine the legislative intent of the Office, including regulations that impose undue
restrictions or financial requirements;
(5) oversee the appropriation of funds and the training of recipients of
funds from the Community Reinvestment and Repair Fund under § 1–3A–03 of the
Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article;
(6) provide recommendations to the Maryland Cannabis Administration on
regulations related to:
(i) diversity; and
(ii) social equity applications;
(7) work with the Maryland Cannabis Administration to implement free
technical assistance for social equity and minority cannabis business applicants;
(8) produce reports and recommendations on diversity and equity in
ownership, management, and employment in the legal cannabis economy; and
(9) assist businesses with obtaining financing through the Capital Access
Program under Title 36, Subtitle 14 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.